North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-36 Devils Lake Outlet Committee

61-36-01.
Devils Lake outlets management advisory committee — Members — Terms — Vacancies.

The Devils Lake outlets management advisory committee consists of:

The governor or governor’s designee;

A representative from Benson County appointed by the governor;

A representative from Ramsey County appointed by the governor;

A representative from Towner County appointed by the governor;

A representative from Nelson County appointed by the governor;

A representative from the Devils Lake joint water resource board appointed by the governor;

A representative from the Spirit Lake Nation appointed by the governor;

A representative from the city of Devils Lake appointed by the governor;

A representative from Barnes County appointed by the governor;

A representative from Valley City appointed by the governor;

A representative from Lisbon or Fort Ransom appointed by the governor;

A representative from Fargo appointed by the governor;

A representative from Grand Forks appointed by the governor;

The governor of Minnesota or a designee appointed by the governor of Minnesota;

The premier of Manitoba or the premier’s designee; and

A member of the house and a member of the senate, one representing the Devils Lake basin region and one representing the downstream region, appointed by the chairman of the legislative management.

All appointed members serve for a term of four years or until their successors are appointed and qualified.

Terms expire on the first day of July.

The terms of appointed members must be staggered by lot so that at least three of the terms expire each year.

Members of the committee may be reappointed for additional terms and except for the legislative members, serve at the pleasure of the governor.

A vacancy must be filled in the same manner as original appointments for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 524, § 1; 2005, ch. 595, § 1; 2013, ch. 489, § 1.

61-36-02.
Chairman — Quorum — Meetings.

The governor or governor’s designee is the chairman of the committee. A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum. The committee shall hold meetings at the call of the chairman before initial operation of the outlets, and at such other times as the chairman deems necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 524, § 2; 2013, ch. 489, § 2.

61-36-03.
Compensation and expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 489, § 4.

61-36-04.
Duties of the committee.

The committee shall advise the governor and the state water commission regarding operations of all Devils Lake outlets. The committee may recommend criteria for operation of each outlet based on outflow volumes, water quality considerations, and the risk of an overflow of Devils Lake. Any recommendations developed by the committee must receive support from ten of the seventeen members of the committee before submission to the governor or state water commission. Any recommendation not receiving majority support but receiving support from at least five members may be submitted as a minority recommendation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 524, § 4; 2013, ch. 489, § 3.